Utah statutes.
31A-19a-404.   Designated rate service organization.

(1) For purposes of workers' compensation insurance, the commissioner shall designate one rate service organization to:

(a)  develop and administer the uniform statistical plan, uniform classification plan, and uniform experience rating plan filed with and approved by the commissioner;

(b)  assist the commissioner in gathering, compiling, and reporting relevant statistical information on an aggregate basis;

(c)  develop and file manual rules, subject to the approval of the commissioner, that are reasonably related to the recording and reporting of data pursuant to the uniform statistical plan, uniform experience rating plan, and the uniform classification plan; and

(d)  develop and file the prospective loss costs pursuant to Section 31A-19a-406.

(2)  The uniform experience rating plan shall:

(a)  contain reasonable eligibility standards;

(b)  provide adequate incentives for loss prevention; and

(c)  provide for sufficient premium differentials so as to encourage safety.

(3)  Each workers' compensation insurer, directly or through its selected rate service organization, shall:

(a)  record and report its workers' compensation experience to the designated rate service organization as set forth in the uniform statistical plan approved by the commissioner;

(b)  adhere to a uniform classification plan and uniform experience rating plan filed with the commissioner by the rate service organization designated by the commissioner; and

(c)  adhere to the prospective loss costs filed by the designated rate service organization.

(4)  The commissioner may adopt rules for:

(a)  the development and administration by the designated rate service organization of the:

(i)  uniform statistical plan;

(ii)  uniform experience rating plan; and

(iii)  uniform classification plan;

(b)  the recording and reporting of statistical data and experience rating data by the various insurers writing workers' compensation insurance;

(c)  the selection, retention, and termination of the designated rate service organization; and

(d)  providing for the equitable sharing and recovery of the expense of the designated rate service organization to develop, maintain, and provide the plans, services, and filings that are used by the various insurers writing workers' compensation insurance.

(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), an insurer may develop directly or through its selected rate service organization subclassifications of the uniform classification system upon which a rate may be made.

(b)  A subclassification shall be filed with the commissioner 30 days before its use.

(c) The commissioner shall disapprove subclassifications if the insurer fails to demonstrate that the data produced by the subclassifications can be reported consistently with the uniform statistical plan and uniform classification plan.

(6)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3), an insurer may, directly or though its selected rate service organization, develop its own experience modifications based on the uniform statistical plan, uniform classification plan, and uniform rating plan filed by the rate service organization designated by the commissioner under Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 130, 1999 General Session

